California, session 20252026, AB2481.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14549.1 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:14549.1. (a) In order to improve the quality and marketability of empty beverage containers collected for recycling in the state by curbside recycling programs or dropoff or collection programs, the department may, consistent with Section 14581 and subject to the availability of funds, pay a quality incentive payment for each material type, as specified in subdivision (c).(b) The department may make a quality incentive payment pursuant to this section to either an operator of a curbside recycling program registered pursuant to Section 14551.5, or to any other entity certified pursuant to this division.(c) Subject to subdivision (a), the department shall pay a quality incentive payment for each type of beverage container material in accordance with the following conditions:(1) For quality incentive payments for empty glass beverage containers, all of the following shall apply:(A) The department may make a quality incentive payment only for color-sorted glass beverage containers that are substantially free of contamination and are used for the manufacturing of glass beverage containers in this state.(B) The department may make a quality incentive payment for empty glass beverage containers that are either collected color sorted by curbside recycling programs or dropoff or collection programs, or that are collected mixed color by curbside recycling programs or dropoff or collection programs and are subsequently color sorted by the collector or any other entity certified pursuant to this division.(C) The amount of the quality incentive payment for empty glass beverage containers shall be up to sixty dollars ($60) per ton, as determined by the department.(D) (i) At the end of the calendar year and following the second biannual disbursement of quality incentive payments for color-sorted glass beverage containers and empty glass beverage containers used for the manufacturing of glass beverage containers in the state, state pursuant to subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, the department may use any remaining funds from the annual appropriation under paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 14581 to make a quality incentive payment disbursement payments for empty glass beverage containers that are substantially free from contamination and used by other manufacturers in the state, including, but not limited to, manufacturers of fiberglass insulation in the state that use glass cullet. for the manufacturing of glass products in the state that are not beverage containers.(ii) The amount of the quality incentive payment pursuant to this subparagraph shall be up to thirty dollars ($30) per ton, as determined by the department, and shall be available only for material that would otherwise qualify for quality incentive payments under subparagraph (A).(2) For quality incentive payments for empty plastic beverage containers, both of the following shall apply:(A) The department may make a quality incentive payment only for plastic beverage containers collected by curbside recycling programs or dropoff or collection programs, that are sorted by resin type, consistent with any quality specifications that the department may adopt.(B) The amount of the quality plastic incentive payment shall be up to one hundred eighty dollars ($180) per ton, as determined by the department.(3) For quality payments for empty aluminum beverage containers, all of the following shall apply:(A) The department may make a quality incentive payment only for aluminum beverage containers that are free of any and all metallic and nonmetallic items, other than used aluminum containers.(B) The department may make a quality incentive payment for empty aluminum beverage containers that are collected commingled by curbside recycling programs or dropoff or collection programs, and subsequently cleaned by the collector or any other entity certified pursuant to this division, of any and all metallic and nonmetallic items, other than used aluminum containers, consistent with any quality specifications that the department may adopt.(C) The amount of the quality incentive payment for empty aluminum beverage containers shall be up to one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) per ton, as determined by the department.(d) An operator of a curbside recycling program or any other certified entity receiving a quality incentive payment shall make available for inspection and review any relevant record that the department determines is necessary to verify the accuracy of data upon which the quality incentive payment is based and the operator’s or certified entity’s compliance with any applicable regulation.(e) The department may make only one quality incentive payment for each empty beverage container collected pursuant to this section.